Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 3. Procedures Governing Parole.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 86; 7A M.J. Escape, § 2; 14A M.J. Pardon, Probation and Parole, §§ 2, 5; 16 M.J. Robbery, § 9.

§ 53.1-151.
Eligibility for parole.

Except as herein otherwise provided, every person convicted of a felony and sentenced and committed by a court under the laws of this Commonwealth to the Department of Corrections, whether or not such person is physically received at a Department of Corrections facility, or as provided for in §

19.2-308.1

:

For the first time, shall be eligible for parole after serving one-fourth of the term of imprisonment imposed, or after serving twelve years of the term of imprisonment imposed if one-fourth of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than twelve years;

For the second time, shall be eligible for parole after serving one-third of the term of imprisonment imposed, or after serving thirteen years of the term of imprisonment imposed if one-third of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than thirteen years;

For the third time, shall be eligible for parole after serving one-half of the term of imprisonment imposed, or after serving fourteen years of the term of imprisonment imposed if one-half of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than fourteen years;

For the fourth or subsequent time, shall be eligible for parole after serving three-fourths of the term of imprisonment imposed, or after serving fifteen years of the term of imprisonment imposed if three-fourths of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than fifteen years.For the purposes of subdivisions 2, 3 and 4 of subsection A and for the purposes of subsections B1 and B2, prior commitments shall include commitments to any correctional facility under the laws of any state, the District of Columbia, the United States or its territories for murder, rape, robbery, forcible sodomy, animate or inanimate object sexual penetration, aggravated sexual battery, abduction, kidnapping, burglary, felonious assault or wounding, or manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing or possessing with the intent to manufacture, sell, give or distribute a controlled substance, if such would be a felony if committed in the Commonwealth. Only prior commitments interrupted by a person’s being at liberty, or resulting from the commission of a felony while in a correctional facility of the Commonwealth, of any other state or of the United States, shall be included in determining the number of times such person has been convicted, sentenced and committed for the purposes of subdivisions 2, 3 and 4 of subsection A. “At liberty” as used herein shall include not only freedom without any legal restraints, but shall also include release pending trial, sentencing or appeal, or release on probation or parole or escape. In the case of terms of imprisonment to be served consecutively, the total time imposed shall constitute the term of the imprisonment; in the case of terms of imprisonment to be served concurrently, the longest term imposed shall be the term of imprisonment. In any case in which a parolee commits an offense while on parole, only the sentence imposed for such offense and not the sentence or sentences or any part thereof from which he was paroled shall constitute the term of imprisonment.The Department of Corrections shall make all reasonable efforts to determine prior convictions and commitments of each inmate for the enumerated offenses.

Persons sentenced to die shall not be eligible for parole. Any person sentenced to life imprisonment who escapes from a correctional facility or from any person in charge of his custody shall not be eligible for parole.

B1.

Any person convicted of three separate felony offenses of (i) murder, (ii) rape or (iii) robbery by the presenting of firearms or other deadly weapon, or any combination of the offenses specified in subdivisions (i), (ii) or (iii) when such offenses were not part of a common act, transaction or scheme shall not be eligible for parole. In the event of a determination by the Department of Corrections that an individual is not eligible for parole under this subsection, the Parole Board may in its discretion, review that determination, and make a determination for parole eligibility pursuant to regulations promulgated by it for that purpose. Any determination of the Parole Board of parole eligibility thereby shall supersede any prior determination of parole ineligibility by the Department of Corrections under this subsection.

B2.

Any person convicted of three separate felony offenses of manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing or possessing with the intent to manufacture, sell, give or distribute a controlled substance, when such offenses were not part of a common act, transaction or scheme, and who has been at liberty as defined in this section between each conviction, shall not be eligible for parole.

Any person sentenced to life imprisonment for the first time shall be eligible for parole after serving fifteen years, except that if such sentence was for a Class 1 felony violation or the first degree murder of a child under the age of eight in violation of §

18.2-32

, he shall be eligible for parole after serving twenty-five years, unless he is ineligible for parole pursuant to subsection B1 or B2.

A person who has been sentenced to two or more life sentences, except a person to whom the provisions of subsection B1, B2, or E of this section are applicable, shall be eligible for parole after serving twenty years of imprisonment, except that if either such sentence, or both, was or were for a Class 1 felony violation, and he is not otherwise ineligible for parole pursuant to subsection B1, B2, or E of this section, he shall be eligible for parole only after serving thirty years.

A person convicted of an offense and sentenced to life imprisonment after being paroled from a previous life sentence shall not be eligible for parole.

E1.

Any person who has been convicted of murder in the first degree, rape in violation of §

18.2-61

, forcible sodomy, animate or inanimate object sexual penetration or aggravated sexual battery and who has been sentenced to a term of years shall, upon a first commitment to the Department of Corrections, be eligible for parole after serving two-thirds of the term of imprisonment imposed or after serving fourteen years of the term of imprisonment imposed if two-thirds of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than fourteen years. If such person has been previously committed to the Department of Corrections, such person shall be eligible for parole after serving three-fourths of the term of imprisonment imposed or after serving fifteen years of the terms of imprisonment imposed if three-fourths of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than fifteen years.

If the sentence of a person convicted of a felony and sentenced to the Department is partially suspended, he shall be eligible for parole based on the portion of such sentence execution which was not suspended.

The eligibility time for parole as specified in subsections A, C and D of this section may be modified as provided in §§

53.1-191

,

53.1-197

and

53.1-198

.

The time for eligibility for parole as specified in subsection D of this section shall apply only to those criminal acts committed on or after July 1, 1976.

The provisions of subdivisions 2, 3 and 4 of subsection A shall apply only to persons committed to the Department of Corrections on or after July 1, 1979, but such persons’ convictions and commitments shall include all felony convictions and commitments without regard to the date of such convictions and commitments.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-251, 53-272; 1954, c. 141; 1956, c. 342; 1958, cc. 249, 468; 1962, c. 327; 1970, c. 648; 1975, c. 244; 1976, cc. 145, 209, 425; 1977, cc. 344, 546, 570; 1979, c. 411; 1981, c. 392; 1982, cc. 270, 636; 1985, c. 555; 1987, c. 668; 1988, c. 872; 1990, cc. 220, 684; 1991, c. 423; 1993, cc. 485, 491, 907.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to sentence of person twice previously convicted of certain violent felonies, see §

19.2-297.1

.

Law Review.

For article, “Federal Habeas Corpus: State Prisoners and the Concept of Custody,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1969).

For article on the parole process in Virginia, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 505 (1982).

For article, “Virginia’s Capital Jurors,” 44 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2063 (2003).

§ 53.1-152.
Eligibility of persons sentenced for combinations of felony and misdemeanor offenses.

Every person who is convicted of a felony and also convicted of a misdemeanor and sentenced and committed for the same under the laws of this Commonwealth or of its political subdivisions shall be eligible for parole on the combination of said sentences in the same manner as provided in §

53.1-151

.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-252.1; 1954, c. 597; 1966, c. 638; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-153.
Eligibility of persons sentenced to jails for more than twelve months.

Persons convicted of felonies or misdemeanors who are sentenced to jails and not eligible for parole under §

53.1-152

, shall be eligible for parole in the same manner as provided in §

53.1-151

when the total sentences to be served, exclusive of fines, are more than twelve months. However, a person convicted of misdemeanors and sentenced to serve a total active sentence of more than 12 months in jail shall not be eligible for parole nor subject to the provisions of §

53.1-159

upon conviction of any offenses committed on or after July 1, 2008.

The Virginia Parole Board shall have the same powers and duties to carry out the provisions of this section as are set forth in §

53.1-136

.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-251.2; 1962, c. 326; 1970, c. 648; 1981, c. 392; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 509; 2008, c. 846.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 846 added the last sentence to the first paragraph.

§ 53.1-154.
Times at which Virginia Parole Board to review cases.

The Virginia Parole Board shall by regulation divide each calendar year into such equal parts as it may deem appropriate to the efficient administration of the parole system. Unless there be reasonable cause for extension of the time within which to review and decide a case, the Board shall review and decide the case of each prisoner no later than that part of the calendar year in which he becomes eligible for parole, and at least annually thereafter, until he is released on parole or discharged, except that upon any such review the Board may schedule the next review as much as three years thereafter, provided there are ten years or more or life imprisonment remaining on the sentence in such case. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in the case of a parole revocation, if such person is otherwise eligible for parole, the Board shall review and decide his case no later than that part of the calendar year one year subsequent to the part of the calendar year in which he was returned to a facility as provided in §

53.1-161

. Thereafter, his case shall be reviewed as specified in this section. The Board, in addition, may review the case of any prisoner eligible for parole at any other time and may review the case of any prisoner prior to that part of the year otherwise specified. In the discretion of the Board, interviews may be conducted by the Board or its representatives and may be either public or private.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-252, 53-254; 1966, c. 638; 1970, c. 648; 1977, c. 34; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 655.

§ 53.1-154.1.
Authority of Director to recommend parole review; release upon review.

The Director is authorized to determine those prisoners who may be suitable parole risks and whose interests and those of society will be served by their early parole release and to recommend such prisoners to the Parole Board for early parole consideration. In making such recommendation, the Director shall take into account the prisoner’s criminal history record, mental and physical condition, employability, institutional adjustment and such other factors as may be appropriate, including the risk of violence to others. The case of any such prisoner so recommended may be reviewed by the Parole Board prior to such prisoner’s date of eligibility for parole. Upon appropriate review the Parole Board may release on parole prior to the date of eligibility for parole any prisoner so recommended by the Director. However, no prisoner shall be released until he has served at least one-fourth of the term of imprisonment imposed, or until he has served twelve years of the term of imprisonment imposed if one-fourth of the term of imprisonment imposed is more than twelve years, except as such time is reduced by any other provision of law.

This section shall have no application to persons not eligible for parole pursuant to subsections B, B1 and E of §

53.1-151

.

History.

1983, c. 378; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 deleted “in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Corrections” following “authorized” in the first sentence and made stylistic changes.

§ 53.1-155.
Investigation prior to release; transition assistance.

No person shall be released on parole by the Board until a thorough investigation has been made into the prisoner’s history, physical and mental condition and character and his conduct, employment and attitude while in prison. The Board shall also determine that his release on parole will not be incompatible with the interests of society or of the prisoner. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to persons released on parole pursuant to §

53.1-159

.

An investigation conducted pursuant to this section shall include notification that a victim may submit to the Virginia Parole Board evidence concerning the impact that the release of the prisoner will have on such victim. This notification shall be sent to the last address provided to the Board by any victim of a crime for which the prisoner was incarcerated. If additional victim research is necessary, electronic notification shall be sent to the attorney for the Commonwealth and the director of the victim/witness program, if one exists, of the jurisdiction in which the offense occurred. The Board shall endeavor diligently to contact the victim prior to making any decision to release any inmate on discretionary parole. The victim of a crime for which the prisoner is incarcerated may present to the Board oral or written testimony concerning the impact that the release of the prisoner will have on the victim, and the Board shall consider such testimony in its review. Once testimony is submitted by a victim, such testimony shall remain in the prisoner’s parole file and shall be considered by the Board at every parole review. The victim of a crime for which the prisoner is incarcerated may submit a request in writing or by electronic means to the Board to be notified of (i) the prisoner’s parole eligibility date and mandatory release date as determined by the Department of Corrections, (ii) any parole-related interview dates, and (iii) the Board’s decision regarding parole for the prisoner. The victim may request that the Board only notify the victim if, following its review, the Board is inclined to grant parole to the prisoner, in which case the victim shall have forty-five days to present written or oral testimony for the Board’s consideration. If the victim has requested to be notified only if the Board is inclined to grant parole and no testimony, either written or oral, is received from the victim within at least forty-five days of the date of the Board’s notification, the Board shall render its decision based on information available to it in accordance with subsection A. The definition of victim in §

19.2-11.01

shall apply to this section.Although any information presented by the victim of a crime for which the prisoner is incarcerated shall be retained in the prisoner’s parole file and considered by the Board, such information shall not infringe on the Board’s authority to exercise its decision-making authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, if a physical or mental examination of a prisoner eligible for parole has been conducted within the last twelve months, and the prisoner has not required medical or psychiatric treatment within a like period while incarcerated, the prisoner may be released on parole by the Parole Board directly from a local correctional facility.The Department shall offer each prisoner to be released on parole or under mandatory release who has been sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment of at least three years the opportunity to participate in a transition program within six months of such prisoner’s projected or mandatory release date. The program shall include advice for job training opportunities, recommendations for living a law-abiding life, and financial literacy information. The Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security shall prescribe guidelines to govern these programs.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-253; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1987, c. 668; 1992, c. 222; 1995, cc. 687, 778; 2002, c. 569; 2016, c. 208; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 545.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Code Commission, Acts 1995, c. 687, which amended this section, was not given effect due to a conflict with the other 1995 amendment to this section. Acts 1995, c. 687, in subsection B, inserted “the last known address of, and as provided by” and substituted “so that such victim” for “who has requested notice of the prisoner’s pending release or discharge pursuant to §

53.1-160

, that such victim.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 569, in subsection B, deleted “when such victim has requested notice of the prisoner’s pending release on discretionary or mandatory parole pursuant to the first paragraph of §

53.1-159

” from the end of the second sentence, and inserted the present third sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 208 added the second paragraph in subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 545, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B in the first paragraph, inserted the third sentence and substituted “request in writing or by electronic means” for “written request.”

§ 53.1-155.1.
Participation in residential community program prior to final release.

The Department may give nonviolent prisoners who have not been convicted of a violent crime and who have been sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment of at least three years the opportunity to participate in a residential community program, work release, or a community-based program approved by the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security within six months of such prisoner’s projected or mandatory release date. The Secretary shall prescribe guidelines to govern the residential community programs, work release, or community-based programs.

Any wages earned pursuant to this section by a prisoner may be paid to the director or administrator of the program after standard payroll deductions required by law. Distribution of such wages shall be made for the following purposes:

To pay an amount to defray the cost of his keep;

To pay travel and other such expenses made necessary by his work release, employment, or participation in a residential community program or a community-based program;

To provide support and maintenance for his dependents or to make payments to the local department of social services or the Commissioner of Social Services, as appropriate, on behalf of dependents who are receiving public assistance as defined in §

63.2-100

; or

To pay any fines, restitution, or costs as ordered by the court.

Any balance at the end of his sentence shall be paid to the prisoner upon his release.

History.

2003, c. 850; 2014, cc. 115, 490.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 115, effective March 3, 2014, and c. 490, effective April 2, 2014, are identical, and in the first sentence in the first paragraph inserted “and Homeland Security.”

§ 53.1-156.
Period of parole; not counted as part of term.

The period of parole which shall be fixed by the Board may be greater than the unserved portion of the sentence actually imposed upon the paroled prisoner by the court or jury which fixed his sentence. It shall not exceed, however, the difference between the time actually served in confinement by the paroled prisoner, without regard to good conduct credit, and the maximum term established by law as punishment for the offense or offenses of which the prisoner was convicted. The time during which a parolee is at large on parole shall not be counted as service of any part of the term of imprisonment for which he was sentenced upon his conviction.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-255, 53-256; 1982, c. 636; 1987, c. 668.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 77; 14A M.J. Pardon, Probation and Parole, § 5.

§ 53.1-157.
Parolees or felons serving a period of postrelease supervision to comply with terms; furnishing copies.

Each parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision while on parole or period of postrelease supervision shall comply with such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the Board. When any prisoner is released on parole or postrelease period of supervision, the Board shall furnish the parolee and the probation and parole officer having supervision of the parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision a copy of the terms and conditions of the parole or postrelease period of supervision and any changes which may from time to time be made therein.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-257; 1970, c. 648; 1973, c. 253; 1982, c. 636; 2000, c. 767.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 767, inserted “or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision” in the first and second sentences, inserted “or period of postrelease supervision” in the first sentence, and inserted “or postrelease period of supervision” twice in the second sentence.

§ 53.1-158.
Release of prisoner subject to parole.

The Director of the Department shall release into the custody of the Parole Board, any of its probation and parole officers or the Chairman, any prisoner subject to parole under the laws of this Commonwealth whenever directed so to do by the Parole Board or by the Chairman.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-264; 1970, c. 648; 1973, c. 253; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-159.
Mandatory release on parole.

Every person who is sentenced and committed under the laws of the Commonwealth to the Department of Corrections or as provided for in §§

19.2-308.1

,

53.1-152

or §

53.1-153

shall be released on parole by the Virginia Parole Board six months prior to his date of final release. Each person so sentenced or committed, however, shall serve a minimum of three months of his sentence prior to such a release. Persons who are so released on parole shall be subject to a minimum of six months’ supervision and an additional period of parole ending on the date upon which the parolee would have served the maximum term of confinement, or any period the Board otherwise deems appropriate in accordance with §

53.1-156

. Such persons shall also be subject, for the entire period of parole fixed by the Board, to such terms and conditions prescribed by the Board in accordance with §

53.1-157

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the preceding paragraph, if within thirty days of a release scheduled pursuant to this section, new information is presented to the Board which gives the Board reasonable cause to believe that the release poses a clear and present danger to the life or physical safety of any person, the Board may delay the release for up to six months to investigate the matter and to refer it to law-enforcement, mental health or other appropriate authorities for investigation and any other appropriate action by such authorities.

No person released on parole pursuant to §

53.1-136

, and whose parole is subsequently revoked, shall be released on parole pursuant to this section until at least six months have elapsed from the date of the decision revoking his parole. No person released on parole pursuant to this section, whose parole is subsequently revoked, shall thereafter be released on parole pursuant to this section. Final discharge may be extended to require the prisoner to serve the full portion of the term imposed by the sentencing court which was unexpired when the prisoner was released on parole.

For purposes of this section, (i)
“maximum term of confinement”
means the maximum term of incarceration established by law as punishment for the offense, (ii)

“mandatory release date”

means that date which is six months prior to the scheduled date of release and takes into consideration good conduct credits, and (iii)

“final discharge”

and

“discharge from parole”

mean that a prisoner is released from confinement having satisfied the full term imposed by the sentencing court without regard to good conduct credit. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to create a right or entitlement to parole.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-251.3; 1979, c. 415; 1981, cc. 20, 392; 1982, c. 636; 1985, c. 175; 1987, c. 668; 1991, c. 410; 1994, c. 894.

§ 53.1-160.
Notice to be given upon prisoner release, escape, etc.

Prior to the release or discharge of any prisoner, the Department shall have notice of the release or discharge delivered by first-class mail or by electronic means to the court that committed the person to the Department of Corrections and to the sheriff, chief of police, and attorney for the Commonwealth (i) of the jurisdiction in which the offense occurred, (ii) of the jurisdiction in which the person resided prior to conviction, and (iii), if different from clauses (i) and (ii), of the jurisdiction in which the person intends to reside subsequent to being released or discharged. Such notice shall include, but not be limited to, identification of the specific offense or offenses for which the prisoner had been sentenced, the term or terms of imprisonment imposed, and the date the prisoner was committed to the Department of Corrections.The Department shall (a) have notice of the release or discharge of any prisoner delivered by first-class mail 15 days prior to any such occurrence, or by telephone if notice by first-class mail cannot be delivered 15 days prior to the occurrence; (b) give notice as soon as practicable following the transfer of any prisoner to a jail facility, a different prison facility, or any other correctional or detention facility by first-class mail or telephone; (c) give notice as soon as practicable by telephone upon the escape of a prisoner; and (d) give notice as soon as practicable by first-class mail upon the change of a prisoner’s name, to any victim, as defined in §

19.2-11.01

, of the offense for which the prisoner was incarcerated or to any person designated in writing by the victim. Notice shall be given using the address and telephone number provided by the victim. For the purposes of this section, “prisoner” means a person sentenced to serve more than 30 days of incarceration or detention.

Fifteen days prior to the release of any prisoner to an authorized work release program or release to attend a business, educational or other related community program, the Department shall give notice to (i) the attorney for the Commonwealth, (ii) the chief law-enforcement officer of the jurisdiction in which the work on release will be performed or attendance at an authorized program will be permitted, and (iii) any victim, as defined in §

19.2-11.01

, of the offense for which the prisoner was incarcerated or any person designated in writing by the victim at the address or phone number provided by the victim.Every notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth or to the chief law-enforcement officer shall include the name, address, and criminal history of the participating prisoner, and other information upon request. The transmission of information shall be confidential and not subject to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

Notification under this section may be provided to a victim as defined in §

19.2-11.01

through the Virginia Statewide VINE (Victim Information and Notification Everyday) System or other similar electronic or automated system.No civil liability shall attach for the failure to give notice as provided in this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-265.1; 1980, c. 515; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 155; 1989, cc. 525, 652; 1993, c. 189; 1995, c. 687; 2007, cc. 94, 109; 2013, cc. 162, 209; 2015, c. 101.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 94 and 109 are identical, and inserted subsection C before the last paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 162 and 209 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “first-class mail or by electronic means to the court that” for “first class mail to the court which” and inserted “clauses” preceding “(i) and (ii)” and in the last paragraph, redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 101 in the second paragraph in subsection A deleted “or of his transfer to a jail facility, a different prison facility, or any other correctional or detention facility” following “discharge of any prisoner” in clause (a), added clause (b) and redesignated former clauses (b) and (c) as clauses (c) and (d).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Prisons and Prisoners, § 5.

§ 53.1-160.1.
Department to give notice of Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry requirements to certain prisoners.

Prior to the release or discharge of any prisoner for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, the Department shall give notice to the prisoner of his duty to register with the State Police. A person required to register shall register, submit to be photographed as part of the registration, and provide information regarding place of employment, if available, to the Department. The Department shall also obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police, inform the person of his duties regarding reregistration and change of address, and inform the person of his duty to register. The Department shall forward the registration information to the Department of State Police on the date of the prisoner’s release or discharge.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the Department shall promptly investigate or request the State Police promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was released or discharged. The Department shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

The Department shall notify the State Police immediately upon discovering the escape of any prisoner for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1.

History.

1994, c. 362; 1997, c. 747; 2003, c. 584; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2010, c. 858.

Cross references.

For regulations governing the operation and maintenance of the sex offender and crimes against minors registry, see 19 VAC 30-170-15 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 747, cl. 2, provided: “That, prior to July 1, 1997, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably practicable, the Department of State Police shall promulgate regulations consistent with and necessary for implementation of the requirements of this act and 42 U.S.C. § 14071.”

The 1997 amendment

substituted “an offense for which registration is required as defined in §

19.2-298.1

” for “a felony in violation of §§

18.2-61

,

18.2-63

,

18.2-64.1

,

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-67.2

,

18.2-67.3

,

18.2-67.5

,

18.2-370

or §

18.2-370.1

or, where the victim is a minor or is physically helpless or mentally incapacitated as defined in §

18.2-67.10

, subsection B of §

18.2-361

or subsection B of §

18.2-366

” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 584, in the first sentence, substituted “sentence for an offense for which registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1” for “sentence upon a conviction of an offense for which registration is required as defined in §

19.2-298.1

,” and deleted “in accordance with §

19.2-298.1

” at the end of that sentence, and deleted “under this section” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are nearly identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph, and in subsection A deleted “serving a sentence for an offense” after “any prisoner” and substituted “whom” for “which” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “on the date of the prisoner’s release or discharge” for “within seven days of receipt” at the end of the third sentence; and added subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 858 added subsection C.

§ 53.1-161.
Arrest and return of parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision; warrant; release pending adjudication of violation.

The Chairman or any member of the Board may at any time upon information or a showing of a violation or a probable violation by any parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision of any of the terms or conditions upon which he was released on parole or postrelease period of supervision, issue or cause to be issued, a warrant for the arrest and return of the parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision to the institution from which he was paroled, or to any other correctional facility which may be designated by the Chairman or member. However, a determination of whether a parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision returned to a correctional facility pursuant to this section shall be returned to a state or local correctional facility shall be made based on the length of the parolee’s original sentence as set forth in §

53.1-20

or the period of postrelease supervision as set at sentencing. Each such warrant shall authorize all officers named therein to arrest and return the parolee to actual custody in the facility from which he was paroled, or to any other facility designated by the Chairman or member.

In any case in which the parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision is charged with the violation of any law, the violation of which caused the issuance of such warrant, upon request of the parolee or his attorney, the Chairman or member shall as soon as practicable consider all the circumstances surrounding the allegations of such violation, including the probability of conviction thereof, and may, after such consideration, release the parolee, pending adjudication of the violation charged.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-258; 1970, c. 648; 1973, c. 253; 1976, c. 45; 1978, c. 227; 1982, c. 636; 1990, cc. 676, 768; 2000, c. 767.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 767, inserted “or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision” in the first and second sentences and in the first sentence of the second paragraph, and inserted “or postrelease period of supervision” and “or the period of postrelease supervision as set at sentencing” in the first sentence.

§ 53.1-162.
Arrest of parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision without warrant; written statement.

Any probation and parole officer may arrest a parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision without a warrant or may deputize any other officer with power of arrest to do so by a written statement setting forth that the parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision has, in the judgment of the probation and parole officer, violated one or more of the terms or conditions of his parole or postrelease period of supervision. Such a written statement by a probation and parole officer delivered to the officer in charge of any state or local correctional facility shall be sufficient warrant for the detention of the parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision. Any officer deputized upon receipt of the written statement shall, in accordance with §

19.2-390

, enter, or cause to be entered, the person’s name and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the “information systems” known as the Virginia Criminal Information Network (VCIN), established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52. Such information shall be deemed a warrant authorizing the arrest of the person anywhere in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-259; 1982, c. 636; 2000, c. 767; 2010, c. 273.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 767, inserted “or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision” twice in the first sentence and once in the last sentence, and inserted “or postrelease period of supervision” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 273 added the last two sentences.

§ 53.1-163.
Parolee considered as escapee after issuance of warrant.

Any parolee for whose arrest a warrant has been issued by the Board or by the Chairman shall after the issuance of the warrant be treated as an escaped prisoner. The time from the issuing of such warrant to the date of his arrest shall not be counted as any part of the time to be served under his sentence.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-260; 1970, c. 648; 1973, c. 253; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-164.
Procedure for return of parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision.

When any parolee or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision is returned to any facility in accordance with the provisions of §

53.1-161

, he shall be held in accordance with rules of the Director and subject to further action of the Parole Board. The officer in charge of the facility shall see that the Parole Board is notified promptly of each such parolee’s or felon’s return.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-261; 1970, c. 648; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636; 2000, c. 767; 2020, c. 759.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 767 inserted “or felon serving a period of postrelease supervision” in the first sentence, and inserted “or felon’s” in the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director” for “Board of Corrections” in the first sentence.